Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Mississippi Radioactive Waste Transportation Act

§ 45-14-51.
Short title.

Sections 45-14-51 through 45-14-69 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Radioactive Waste Transportation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-53.
Legislative purpose.

The Legislature finds that the transportation of radioactive waste poses a potential threat to the health and safety of the people of Mississippi. The protection of public health and safety in the event of a transportation accident involving radioactive waste requires the preparation of emergency response procedures and the training of public safety officials in the proper response to such an incident. The costs of radiological emergency response planning for transportation accidents should properly be borne by shippers of radioactive waste.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-55.
Definitions.

The following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Agency” shall mean the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency.

“Radioactive waste” shall mean irradiated nuclear reactor fuel, and any other material which emits radiation which the Mississippi State Board of Health determines by regulation to present a significant threat to public health and safety.

“Application” shall mean any request to the agency for a permit to transfer radioactive waste.

“Carrier” shall mean and include a common, contract or private carrier of property by motor vehicle, railroad, aircraft or vessels, including barges.

“Public safety official” shall mean police, fire, health, disaster or emergency management officials of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

“Permit” shall mean the written authorization for the transportation of radioactive waste issued by the agency in accordance with Sections 45-14-57 et seq.

“Fee” shall mean the amount of money levied against a carrier or shipper for a permit required hereunder.

“Fund” shall mean the special emergency management revolving fund, authorized pursuant to the provisions of Section 33-15-11(b)(12), Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Shipper” shall mean any corporation or person to whom has been issued a license authorizing the possession, use or transfer of radioactive waste by the Mississippi State Board of Health, the U. S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, any other agreement state or any agency of the federal government exempt from licensing by the U. S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

“Person” shall mean any corporation or individual or governmental agency of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-57.
Permits for transportation.

No person shall transport radioactive waste in Mississippi except in accordance with a permit issued by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all shippers, carriers and persons transporting radioactive waste in this state and shall cover all transportation into, through, or originating in this state regardless of final destination.

The provisions of this section shall apply to radioactive waste shipped by or for the United States government for military or national security purposes or which are related to the national defense. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as requiring the disclosure of any defense information as defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 and the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974, as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-59.
Application for permit; liability insurance; save harmless provision.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the date upon which a shipper intends to begin the movement of radioactive waste into or within this state, the shipper shall apply to the agency for an annual permit for such shipments. Before any radioactive wastes may be transported into or within this state, the shipper shall:

Comply fully with all applicable laws and administrative rules and regulations, both state and federal, regarding the packaging and transportation of radioactive wastes.

Provide any information as the agency deems necessary for the protection of the health and safety of the public and the environment.

Provide evidence of liability insurance sufficient to protect the state and the public at large from possible radiological injury or damage to any person or property due to packaging or transportation.

Certify to the agency that it will hold the State of Mississippi harmless for all claims, actions or proceedings in law or equity arising out of radiological injury or damage to persons or property occurring during the transportation of its radioactive waste into or within the state, including all costs of defending the same; provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall be construed as a waiver of the state’s sovereign immunity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-61.
Permit fee.

Upon the approval by the agency of an application for a permit to transport radioactive waste, the shipper shall pay a permit fee based on a schedule of fees established by the agency in consultation with the state board of health. The fee shall reflect the relative hazard and potential threat to the public health and safety of the radioactive waste, based upon its volume, radioactivity and toxicity. Upon receipt of such fee the agency shall issue a permit. Such fee shall be deposited into the fund established pursuant to the provisions of Section 33-15-11(b)(12), Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-63.
Notice of shipment.

The shipper shall provide to the director of the agency the advance notification of shipment required by and specified in the regulations promulgated by the Mississippi State Board of Health at the time of shipment. The agency will provide notification of shipment to appropriate state and local public safety officials.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-65.
Training program for public safety officials.

The agency, in conjunction with the state board of health, shall develop as soon as practicable a training program for public safety officials which shall include instruction on emergency response to transportation accidents involving radioactive waste.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-67.
Powers and duties of state board of health.

The Mississippi State Board of Health is hereby authorized and directed to promulgate regulations deemed necessary to implement the provisions of Sections 45-14-51 through 45-14-69.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).

§ 45-14-69.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of Sections 45-14-51 through 45-14-67 or any regulation or order issued hereunder may, upon conviction therefor, be punished by a fine of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for five (5) years, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 432, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1982).